Utah statutes.
63M-7-206.   Election of chair -- Meetings.
The membership of the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice by simple
majority vote of those in attendance shall annually elect one of their number
to serve as chair.  The chair is responsible for the call and conduct of
meetings.  Meetings shall be called and held at least bimonthly.  One of the
bimonthly meetings shall be held while the Legislature is convened in its
annual session.  Additional meetings may be called upon request by a majority
of the commission's members.
